Hawaii statutes.
§91-17 Federal aid. The provisions of
section 91-14 shall not be applicable where such applicability would jeopardize
federal aid or grants of assistance. [L 1961, c 103, §19; Supp, §6C-17; HRS
§91-17]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next